de: Viskositätsgrad des Klappenöls für Blechblasinstrumente: Schwer; Leicht; Mittel; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 铜管乐器润滑剂粘度等级: 高粘度; 低粘度; 中粘度; 其他
es: Grado de viscosidad del lubricante para instrumentos de metal: Pesado; Ligero; Medio; Otro
nb: Viskositetsgrad for smøremiddel til messinginstrumenter: Tung; Lett; Middels; Annet
th: ระดับความหนืดของสารหล่อลื่นสำหรับเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง: หนืดมาก; หนืดน้อย; หนืดปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
ko: 금관악기 윤활유 점도 등급: 고점도; 저점도; 중점도; 기타
bg-BG: Клас на вискозитет на смазката за месингови музикални инструменти: Висок; Нисък; Среден; Друго
da: Viskositetsgrad for smøremiddel til messinginstrumenter: Tyktflydende; Letflydende; Medium; Andet
el: Βαθμός ιξώδους λιπαντικού για χάλκινα όργανα: Παχύρρευστο; Λεπτόρρευστο; Μεσαίο; Άλλο
ja: 真鍮製器具用潤滑油の粘度グレード: ヘビー; ライト; ミディアム; その他
ru: Класс вязкости смазки для духовых инструментов: Высокая (густая); Низкая (жидкая); Средняя; Другое
fr: Grade de viscosité du lubrifiant pour cuivres: Épaisse; Légère; Moyenne; Autre
sv: Viskositetsgrad för smörjmedel för mässingsinstrument: Tjock; Tunn; Medium; Övrigt
hr-HR: Gradacija viskoznosti maziva za mesingane instrumente: Gusto; Rijetko; Srednje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Grad de vâscozitate al lubrifiantului pentru instrumente din alamă: Ridicată; Scăzută; Medie; Altele
lt-LT: Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų tepalo klampumo klasė: Didelio klampumo; Mažo klampumo; Vidutinio klampumo; Kita
cs: Třída viskozity maziva pro žesťové nástroje: Husté; Řídké; Střední; Jiné
hu: Rézfúvós hangszer kenőanyagának viszkozitási osztálya: Sűrű; Híg; Közepes; Egyéb
tr: Pirinç üflemeli çalgı yağlayıcısı viskozite derecesi: Yoğun; İnce; Orta; Diğer
sk-SK: Trieda viskozity maziva pre dychové nástroje: Vysoká; Nízka; Stredná; Iné
nl: Koperblaasinstrument smeermiddel viscositeitsgraad: Zwaar; Licht; Medium; Overig
en: Brass instrument lubricant viscosity grade: Heavy; Light; Medium; Other
fi: Vaskipuhaltimien voiteluaineen viskositeettiluokka: Paksu; Ohut; Keskipaksu; Muu
sl-SI: Stopnja viskoznosti maziva za medeninaste instrumente: Gosto; Redko; Srednje; Drugo
pt-BR: Grau de viscosidade do lubrificante para instrumentos de sopro de metal: Pesada; Leve; Média; Outros
pl: Stopień lepkości smaru do instrumentów blaszanych: Gęsty; Rzadki; Średni; Inny
zh-TW: 黃銅樂器潤滑油黏度等級: 高黏度; 低黏度; 中等; 其他
pt-PT: Grau de viscosidade do lubrificante para instrumentos de latão: Alta; Baixa; Média; Outro
it: Grado di viscosità del lubrificante per strumenti in ottone: Pesante; Leggera; Media; Altro
vi: Độ nhớt của chất bôi trơn nhạc cụ bằng đồng thau: Đặc; Lỏng; Trung bình; Khác